Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1205. CERTIFICATION OF CREDITABLE COVERAGE

Sec. 1205.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan that:

(1) provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including:

(A) an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage that is offered by:

(i) an insurance company;

(ii) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(iii) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(iv) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884; or

(v) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843; and

(B) to the extent permitted by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.), a health benefit plan that is offered by:

(i) a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined by Section 3 of that Act and operating under Chapter 846; or

(ii) an analogous benefit arrangement;

(2) is offered by an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844; or

(3) is offered by any other entity that:

(A) is not authorized under this code or another insurance law of this state; and

(B) contracts directly for health care services on a risk-sharing basis, including a capitation basis.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1205.002. CERTIFICATION OF COVERAGE. (a) A health benefit plan issuer shall provide a certification of coverage as necessary to determine the period of applicable creditable coverage under that health benefit plan.

(b) The certification required under this section must be provided in accordance with the standards adopted by rule by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1205.003. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to:

(1) implement this chapter and related provisions of this code; and

(2) meet the minimum requirements of federal law, including regulations.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1205.004. CREDITABLE COVERAGE. (a) An individual's coverage is creditable coverage for purposes of this chapter if the coverage is provided under:

(1) a self-funded or self-insured employee welfare benefit plan that:

(A) provides health benefits; and

(B) is established in accordance with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.);

(2) a group health benefit plan provided by a health insurer or health maintenance organization;

(3) an individual health insurance policy or evidence of coverage;

(4) Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1395c et seq.);

(5) Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396 et seq.), other than coverage consisting solely of benefits under Section 1928 of that act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396s);

(6) 10 U.S.C. Section 1071 et seq.;

(7) a medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization;

(8) a state health benefits risk pool;

(9) a health plan offered under 5 U.S.C. Section 8901 et seq.;

(10) a public health plan as defined by federal regulations; or

(11) a health benefit plan under Section 5(e), Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Section 2504(e)).

(b) For purposes of this chapter, creditable coverage does not include:

(1) accident-only or disability income insurance or a combination of accident-only and disability income insurance;

(2) coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;

(3) liability insurance, including general liability insurance and automobile liability insurance;

(4) workers' compensation insurance or other similar insurance;

(5) automobile medical payment insurance;

(6) credit-only insurance;

(7) coverage for on-site medical clinics;

(8) other coverage that is:

(A) similar to the coverage described by this subsection under which benefits for medical care are secondary or incidental to other insurance benefits; and

(B) specified by federal regulations;

(9) coverage that provides limited-scope dental or vision benefits;

(10) long-term care, nursing home care, home health care, or community-based care coverage or benefits or any combination of those coverages or benefits;

(11) coverage that provides other limited benefits specified by federal regulations;

(12) coverage for a specified disease or illness;

(13) hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance; or

(14) Medicare supplemental health insurance, as defined by Section 1882(g)(1), Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1395ss), coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under 10 U.S.C. Section 1071 et seq., or other similar supplemental coverage provided under a group plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.